Hawaii statutes.
[§353-137] Automated victim
information and notification system governance committee. (a) There is
established within the department of public safety, an automated victim
information and notification system governance committee. The members of the
governance committee shall be appointed by the director of public safety from a
list submitted by the governance committee; provided that the initial members
of the committee shall be selected by the director from a list of members
provided by the statewide automated victim information and notification
governance committee currently serving in that capacity under a grant from the
federal Bureau of Justice Assistance establishing the victim notification
system.

(b) The terms of the members shall be for four
years and shall commence on July 1 and expire on June 30; provided that the
governance committee may elect to reduce the terms of those initially appointed
so as to provide, as nearly as can be, for the expiration of an equal number of
terms at intervals of one year. No person shall be appointed consecutively to
more than two terms on the governance committee; provided that membership shall
not exceed eight consecutive years. Any member whose term has expired and who
is not disqualified for membership under this subsection may continue in office
as a holdover member until a successor is nominated and appointed; provided
that a holdover member shall not hold office beyond the end of the second
regular legislative session following the expiration of the member's term of
office.

(c) A vacancy occurring in the membership of
the governance committee during a term shall be filled for the unexpired term
thereof as provided in subsection (a). The director of public safety may
remove or suspend for cause any member after due notice and public hearing.

(d) The governance committee members shall
include:

(1) A victim;

(2) One representative from a victim assistance
program in each county;

(3) One representative from the police department of
each county; and

(4) One representative from each of the following:

(A) Mothers Against Drunk Driving shall be
requested to serve;

(B) The Hawaii State Coalition Against
Domestic Violence shall be requested to serve;

(C) Sex Abuse Treatment Center shall be
requested to serve;

(D) Crime victim compensation commission;

(E) The Hawaii paroling authority;

(F) The judiciary;

(G) The crime prevention and justice
assistance division of the department of the attorney general; and

(H) The information technology section of the
department.

The committee members shall elect a member who shall
serve as the chairperson.

(e) The governance committee may advise the
department on the following issues:

(1) The implementation and operation of the system;

(2) The establishment of performance measures;

(3) Specifications and configuration parameters for
the operation of the system;

(4) Management of the system; and

(5) Policies and procedures governing the use of the
system, including policies to safeguard the safety, confidentiality, and
autonomy of victims.

(f) Meetings of the governance committee shall
be held on a quarterly basis during the system's first year of implementation
and no less than twice a year thereafter.

(g) The members of the governance committee
shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses,
including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties.

(h) Members of the governance committee acting
in good faith and within the scope of their duties under this chapter shall be
immune from any civil or criminal liability arising from these acts, except
where the member's conduct would constitute gross negligence, wilful and wanton
misconduct, or intentional misconduct. [L 2012, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next